prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q das     džiausi         das       
SFX Q das     džiausių        das       
SFX Q das     džiausiems      das       
SFX Q das     džiausius       das       
SFX Q das     džiausiais      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiuose     das       
SFX Q das     džiausia        das       
SFX Q das     džiausios       das       
SFX Q das     džiausiai       das       
SFX Q das     džiausioje      das       
SFX Q das     džiausioms      das       
SFX Q das     džiausias       das       
SFX Q das     džiausiomis     das       
SFX Q das     džiausiose      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiasis     das       
SFX Q das     džiausiojo      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiajam     das       
SFX Q das     džiausiąjį      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiuoju     das       
SFX Q das     džiausiajame    das       
SFX Q das     džiausieji      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiųjų      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiesiems   das       
SFX Q das     džiausiuosius   das       
SFX Q das     džiausiaisiais  das       
SFX Q das     džiausiuosiuose das       
SFX Q das     džiausioji      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiosios    das       
SFX Q das     džiausiajai     das       
SFX Q das     džiausiąją      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiąja      das       
SFX Q das     džiausiojoj     das       
SFX Q das     džiausiojoje    das       
SFX Q das     džiausiosioms   das       
SFX Q das     džiausiąsias    das       
SFX Q das     džiausiosiomis  das       
SFX Q das     džiausiosiose   das       
SFX Q dus     džiausio        dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiam       dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausią        dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiu        dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiame      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausi         dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausių        dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiems      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausius       dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiais      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiuose     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausia        dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausios       dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiai       dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausioje      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausioms      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausias       dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiomis     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiose      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiasis     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiojo      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiajam     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiąjį      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiuoju     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiajame    dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausieji      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiųjų      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiesiems   dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiuosius   dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiaisiais  dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiuosiuose dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausioji      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiosios    dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiajai     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiąją      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiąja      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiojoj     dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiojoje    dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiosioms   dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiąsias    dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiosiomis  dus       
SFX Q dus     džiausiosiose   dus       
SFX Q jis     jausio          jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiam         jis       
SFX Q jis     jausią          jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiu          jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiame        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausi           jis       
SFX Q jis     jausių          jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiems        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausius         jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiais        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiuose       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausia          jis       
SFX Q jis     jausios         jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiai         jis       
SFX Q jis     jausioje        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausioms        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausias         jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiomis       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiose        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiasis       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojo        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiajam       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiąjį        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiuoju       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiajame      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausieji        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiųjų        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiesiems     jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiuosius     jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiaisiais    jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiuosiuose   jis       
SFX Q jis     jausioji        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosios      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiajai       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiąją        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiąja        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojoj       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojoje      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosioms     jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiąsias      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosiomis    jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosiose     jis       
SFX Q jys     jausio          jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiam         jys       
SFX Q jys     jausią          jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiu          jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiame        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausi           jys       
SFX Q jys     jausių          jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiems        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausius         jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiais        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiuose       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausia          jys       
SFX Q jys     jausios         jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiai         jys       
SFX Q jys     jausioje        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausioms        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausias         jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiomis       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiose        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiasis       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiojo        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiajam       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiąjį        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiuoju       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiajame      jys       
SFX Q jys     jausieji        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiųjų        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiesiems     jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiuosius     jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiaisiais    jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiuosiuose   jys       
SFX Q jys     jausioji        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiosios      jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiajai       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiąją        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiąja        jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiojoj       jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiojoje      jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiosioms     jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiąsias      jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiosiomis    jys       
SFX Q jys     jausiosiose     jys       
SFX Q jas     jausio          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiam         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausią          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiu          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiame        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi           jas       
SFX Q jas     jausių          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiems        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausius         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiais        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuose       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausia          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausios         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiai         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioje        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioms        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausias         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiomis       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiose        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiasis       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojo        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajam       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiąjį        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuoju       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajame      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausieji        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiųjų        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiesiems     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuosius     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiaisiais    jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuosiuose   jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioji        jas       
